Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-519
Public comfort stations; bonds; amount; issuance.

The city council of a city of the metropolitan class may issue bonds for the purpose of constructing public comfort stations. The city council may issue bonds for such purpose without a vote of the electors in an amount not exceeding fifty thousand dollars in any one year.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. IV, § 16, p. 476;

C.S.1922, § 3640;

C.S.1929, § 14-517;

R.S.1943, § 14-519;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 170.